Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-4904
Additional definitions.

Any term defined in the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 and used in the Quality Jobs Act has the same meaning in the Quality Jobs Act unless the context requires a different meaning.

Laws 1995, LB 829, § 4.

Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, see section 77-2701.